Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1714
Person, defined.

Person shall mean an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, an association, a joint-stock company, a trust in which the interests of the beneficiaries are evidenced by a security, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a political subdivision of a government, but shall not include a contract market designated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission or any clearinghouse thereof or a national securities exchange registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission or any employee, officer, or director of such contract market, clearinghouse, or exchange acting solely in that capacity.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 104.